Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 3

Community Services Agency Act of 1996

37-5-301. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Community Services Agency Act of 1996.”

Acts 1989, ch. 567, § 1; T.C.A., §68-2-1101; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 149.

37-5-302. Purpose.

The purpose of this part is to provide a mechanism to facilitate the provision of services for children and other citizens in need of services in Tennessee through centralized agencies located throughout the state. The community services agencies may contract with any other agencies to provide assistance wherever needed.

Acts 1989, ch. 567, § 3; T.C.A., §68-2-1103; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 149; 2005, ch. 249, § 1.

37-5-303. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Agency” means the community services agency;

“Board” means the community services agency board;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of finance and administration, or the commissioner's designee, unless otherwise stated in this part;

“Department” means the department of finance and administration, unless otherwise stated in this part; and

“Executive director” means the chief administrative officer of a community service agency.

Acts 1989, ch. 567, § 2; T.C.A., §68-2-1102; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 149; 2005, ch. 249, § 2; 2006, ch. 1011, § 1.

37-5-304. Agencies — Establishment — Public function and purpose.

The commissioner is authorized to establish community services agencies as provided in this part. These agencies shall provide coordination of funds or programs for the care of the citizens of the state.

The commissioner may establish one (1) community services agency in the metropolitan area of Memphis and Shelby County.

The commissioner may establish multi-county community service agencies with such geographic boundary lines as may be deemed necessary.

The community services agency shall be a political subdivision and instrumentality of the state. As such, it shall be deemed to be acting in all respects for the benefit of the people of the state in the performance of essential public functions, and shall be deemed to be serving a public purpose through improving and otherwise promoting the well-being of the citizens of the state.

Acts 1989, ch. 567, § 4; T.C.A., §68-2-1104; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 149; 2001, ch. 390, § 2; 2005, ch. 249, § 3; 2006, ch. 1011, § 2; 2007, ch. 222, § 2; 2007, ch. 223, § 2; 2007, ch. 478, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. The Davidson County community service agency, formerly created by this section, terminated pursuant to the provisions of title 4, chapter 29, part 1. Wind-up was complete June 30, 2008.

The East Tennessee community service agency, the Mid-Cumberland community service agency, the Northeast community service agency, the Northwest community service agency, the Shelby County community service agency, the South central community service agency, the Southeast community service agency, the Southwest community service agency, and the Upper Cumberland community service agency, formerly created by this section, terminated pursuant to the provisions of title 4, chapter 29, part 1. Wind-up was complete June 30, 2012. The responsibilities for these agencies were transferred to the statewide community services agency, created by §37-5-305.

Attorney General Opinions. Liability of community service agencies and their boards, OAG 97-092 (6/26/97).

37-5-305. Community services agency board — Statewide community services agency — Creation — Members.

Each community services agency shall be governed by a community services agency board.

There is hereby created and established a statewide community services agency. The statewide board of directors shall consist of the commissioner or the commissioner's designee and twelve (12) members appointed by the governor. The members appointed by the governor shall be as follows:

There shall be one (1) member appointed from each of the nine (9) regional agency areas;

There shall be one (1) member appointed from each of the three (3) grand divisions; and

No two (2) members shall reside in the same county at the time of appointment or reappointment.

The membership of each regional board serving a multi-county community services agency shall be appointed by the governor and shall consist of a representative of each county within the agency boundary and the commissioner or the commissioner's designee.

The membership of each board serving a metropolitan community services agency shall consist of twelve (12) members appointed by the governor, with at least fifty percent (50%) of the appointments made from recommendations by the county mayor. If any municipality within the county has more than sixty percent (60%) of the total population of the county, the governor shall appoint equal number from recommendations submitted by the county mayor and the mayor of the identified municipality.

Appointees to a board governed by subsections (b), (c), and (d) may include, but not be limited to, representatives of the areas of law enforcement, mental health professionals, local education agencies, local courts, social workers, advocates, health care providers, consumers of services provided by the community services agency or persons having specialized knowledge or expertise in the service areas and public and private agencies that provide services to persons in need of services in Tennessee. The members of each board shall be appointed with a good faith effort to reflect a diverse mixture of race and gender.

The term of a member of a board governed by subsections (b), (c), and (d) shall be four (4) years. The terms of initial appointments to the board shall be staggered as follows: one fourth (¼) shall be made for a term of one (1) year, one fourth (¼) for a term of two (2) years, one fourth (¼) for a term of three (3) years, and one fourth (¼) for a term of four (4) years. The governor shall make initial appointments to the statewide board of directors by July 1, 2012.

Members of a board governed by subsections (b), (c), and (d) shall continue in office until the expiration of the terms for which they were respectively appointed and until such time as their successors are appointed.

Vacancies occurring on a board governed by subsections (b), (c), and (d) because of death, resignation or lack of active participation, as determined by the governance policies of the community services agency, shall be filled in the same manner as a regular appointment for the remainder of the unexpired terms.

Members of a board governed by subsections (b), (c), and (d) shall not be compensated for services rendered to the agency, but shall be reimbursed by the agency for actual expenses in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations promulgated by the commissioner of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

A board governed by subsections (b), (c), and (d) shall elect a chair from among its members. The board shall also elect other officers as the board finds necessary and appropriate. Such positions are for a term of one (1) year, but officers may be reelected to serve additional terms.

If any matter before a board governed by subsections (b), (c), and (d) involves a project, transaction or relationship in which a member or the member's associated institution, business or board has a direct or conflicting interest, the member shall disclose to the board that interest and shall be prohibited from participating in discussions and voting on that matter.

Acts 1989, ch. 567, § 5; T.C.A., §68-2-1105; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 149; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2006, ch. 1011, §§ 3-6; 2012, ch. 986, § 18.

Code Commission Notes.

Former subsection (k), concerning service on community services and health agency boards, was deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 2005.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

The statewide community services agency, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§4-29-112,4-29-242.

Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 48 provided that all rules, regulations, orders, and decisions heretofore issued or promulgated by any of the boards or commissions, which the act terminates or merges into another board or commission, shall remain in full force and effect. In the case of the boards or commissions that are merged with another board or commission by the act, all final rules, regulations, orders, and decisions together with any matters that are pending on October 1, 2012, shall hereafter be administered, enforced, modified, or rescinded in accordance with the law applicable to the continuing board or commission.

For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

37-5-306. Community services agency board — Powers.

The board has the following powers and duties in addition to the powers and duties granted to or imposed upon it by other sections of this part to:

Adopt written policies, procedures or rules and regulations to govern its internal operations. If such rules and regulations are proposed, they must be submitted for prior approval to the commissioner;

Make and execute contracts and all other instruments necessary or convenient for the exercise of its duties and responsibilities under this part. All contracts pertaining to acquisitions and improvement of real property, pursuant to § 4-15-102, must be approved in advance by the commissioner and the state building commission. Contracts for services must be approved pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the commissioner;

Acquire or dispose of in the name of the board, real or personal property or any interest therein, including rights or easements, on either a temporary or long-term basis by gift, purchase, transfer, foreclosure, lease or otherwise, subject to subdivision (2);

Procure insurance in amounts and from insurers that it deems desirable to protect itself in carrying out its duties and responsibilities under this part;

Seek assistance from the commissioner of finance and administration, the comptroller of the treasury, the state treasurer and other state agencies;

Receive, administer, allocate and disburse funds made available under this part, funds and contributions from private or local public sources that may be used in support of a community services program, and funds made available under any federal or state assistance program for which an agency organized in accordance with this part may serve as grantee, contractor or sponsor of projects appropriate for inclusion in community services programs;

Perform other acts necessary or convenient to exercise the powers granted or reasonably implied in this part;

Procure goods, materials, supplies and equipment in accordance with applicable state or federal guidelines, and where practical, on a competitive basis; and

Contract with other state agencies to provide services to those agencies as deemed appropriate by the board.

Acts 1989, ch. 567, § 6; T.C.A., §68-2-1106; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 149.

Attorney General Opinions. Liability of community service agencies and their boards, OAG 97-092 (6/26/97).

37-5-307. Commissioner — Powers and duties.

The commissioner has the duty and responsibility to:

Promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the commissioner's responsibilities under this part;

Review and approve plans of operation submitted in accordance with § 37-5-310, with the concurrence of the comptroller of the treasury;

Enter into such contracts, subject to applicable rules and regulations and procedures, as necessary to carry out this part;

Appoint an executive director for each agency with such appointment subject to the approval of the agency board. Nothing in this subdivision (a)(4) shall prohibit a board from submitting recommendations to the commissioner for the appointment of an executive director;

Require each agency to submit annual reports on each preceding fiscal year to reflect the nature and extent of all financial transactions and to assure financial integrity; and

Perform other acts necessary or convenient to exercise the powers granted or reasonably implied in this part.

All rules concerning community service agencies promulgated by the commissioner of children's services prior to July 1, 2005, and in effect on March 12, 2014, shall remain in full force and effect and shall be administered by the department of finance and administration until duly amended, repealed, expired, modified or suspended.

Acts 1989, ch. 567, § 7; T.C.A., §68-2-1107; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 149; 2001, ch. 390, § 3; 2006, ch. 1011, § 7; 2014, ch. 525, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of certain powers and duties to the office of children's services administration in the department of finance and administration, see Executive Order No. 58 (June 29, 1994).

Amendments. The 2014 amendment added (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 525, § 4. March 12, 2014.

37-5-308. Executive director — Employees and expenses.

The executive director, subject to approval of the board and approval of the plan of operation pursuant to §37-5-310, has the authority to hire such employees and incur such expenses as may be necessary for proper discharge of the duties of the agency.

Acts 1989, ch. 567, § 8; T.C.A., §68-2-1108; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 149; 2001, ch. 390, § 4.

37-5-309. Contracts for provisions of health care — Termination.

The agency shall, to the maximum extent possible, contract with private providers, clinics and local governments for the provision of services for the citizens of the state.

The agency shall terminate a contract under the following conditions:

Fraud or misappropriation of funds;

Delivery of services under the contract in a manner not consistent with the appropriate standard of care; or

Other reasons provided under the law and rules and regulations of the commissioner promulgated pursuant to this part.

Additionally, the agency shall have authority to terminate a contract for cause.

Acts 1989, ch. 567, § 9; T.C.A., §68-2-1109; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 149; 2006, ch. 1011, §§ 8, 9.

37-5-310. Plan of operation.

At least ninety (90) days prior to the beginning of each state fiscal year, the board shall submit a plan of operation for review and approval to the commissioner and the comptroller of the treasury. The plan of operation shall be in such form as may be required by the department and shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

A budget for operating and capital expenditure;

Contracts for services;

Appropriate policies and procedures adopted by the board to govern the expenditures of funds; and

Other items as required by the department through rules and regulations.

The plan of operation may be amended during the fiscal year with the written approval of the commissioner and the comptroller of the treasury.

Acts 1989, ch. 567, § 11; T.C.A., §68-2-1111; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 149; 2006, ch. 1011, §§ 10, 11.

Code Commission Notes.

Former subsection (c), concerning the establishment of bank accounts by the agency, was deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 2005.

37-5-311. Disposition of funds.

The executive director of each agency shall deposit with the state treasurer funds received from the United States treasury and other funds earned, given or granted to the agency, including state funds.

Such funds may be invested in the local government investment pool pursuant to title 9, chapter 4, part 7.

The board may establish such bank accounts pursuant to § 9-4-302, as are necessary for the efficient management of the agency.

Acts 1989, ch. 567, § 12; T.C.A. §68-2-1112; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 149.

37-5-312. Annual reports.

Each board shall make an annual report to the governor and to the commissioner.

This report shall contain an accounting for all money received and expended, statistics on persons served during the year, recommendations and such other matters as the board deems pertinent.

Acts 1989, ch. 567, § 13; T.C.A., §68-2-1113; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 149.

37-5-313. Annual audit — Accounting records.

The comptroller of the treasury shall make an annual audit of the program established by this part as part of the comptroller's annual audit pursuant to § 9-3-211.

The community services agencies shall maintain all books and records in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and any additional accounting and reporting requirements published by the comptroller of the treasury. Such records shall be made available for inspection to the department and the comptroller of the treasury, upon request.

Acts 1989, ch. 567, § 14; T.C.A., §68-2-1114; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 149; 2016, ch. 573, § 1.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment substituted “any additional accounting and reporting requirements published by the comptroller of the treasury” for “at no less than those recommended in the ‘Accounting Manual for Recipients of Grant Funds in Tennessee’ published by the comptroller of the treasury” at the end of the first sentence in (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 573, § 2. March 8, 2016.

37-5-314. State employees.

Employees of the community services agencies shall be considered “state employees” for purposes of §9-8-307. Designated volunteers providing services under this part shall also be considered “state employees” for purposes of §9-8-307; provided, that designated volunteers who are medical professionals providing direct health care pursuant to this part shall be considered “state employees” solely for the category of “professional liability” pursuant to § 9-8-307.

Acts 1989, ch. 567, § 15; 1993, ch. 530, § 2; T.C.A., §68-2-1115; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 149; 2012, ch. 798, § 16.

37-5-315. Construction — Generally.

This part shall be given the following construction:

This part shall be construed as remedial legislation and shall be given liberal construction to effectuate its purpose;

This part shall not be construed as creating an employer-employee relationship between the department, the community services agencies or their contractors; and

If any provision of this part or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held to be invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the part that can be given effect without the invalid provisions or applications, and to that end the provisions of this part are declared to be severable.

Acts 1989, ch. 567, § 17; T.C.A., §68-2-1117; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 149.

37-5-316. Participation in retirement system.

Community services agencies shall be eligible to be participating employers in the Tennessee consolidated retirement system.

All liabilities owed by a community health agency and all assets of whatever kind and nature and wherever located, including, but not limited to, real property, personal property, cash, equipment and fund balances held in the name of a community health agency shall be transferred to the appropriate community services agency.

The employees of a community health agency shall be transferred to the appropriate community services agency, and such transfer shall not constitute a break in service for such employees.

No action taken pursuant to this act shall be deemed to change the structure of the organization, formerly known as a community health agency, for federal tax reporting purposes, nor reduce employees' benefit-related plans including, but not limited to, retirement plans, deferred compensation plans, cafeteria plans and health plans.

Contracts or leases entered into prior to May 21, 1996, by and between a community health agency and any entity shall continue in full force and effect as to all essential provisions in accordance with the terms and conditions of such contracts or leases as if such contracts or leases had originally been entered into by and between such entities and the appropriate community services agency, unless and until such contracts or leases are amended or modified by the parties thereto or until the expiration of such contracts or leases.

Acts 1990, ch. 1027, § 13; 1995, ch. 164, § 11; T.C.A., §68-2-1118; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 149.

37-5-317. Transfer of career service employees from community services agencies to the department of children's services or the department of health in certain communities.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, including § 8-30-309, and recognizing the years of faithful and dedicated service to the state of Tennessee by the employees of the community services agencies, community services agency employees who serve in jobs that would be classified as career service, as formerly defined in § 8-30-208 [repealed and reenacted], had they been employed in the state service, and whose functions and positions are transferred to either the department of children's services or the department of health by each department's respective commissioner on or before June 30, 2006, shall be transferred into the department of children's services or the department of health. Such employees shall receive the benefits and protection of career service status and shall be eligible for participation in the state health insurance plan without further examination or competition.

All community service agency employees transferred to the department of children's services or the department of health, pursuant to this part, shall be subject to a minimum probationary period of six (6) months, beginning on the first day of service with the respective department, pursuant to §§ 8-30-312 and 8-30-314, unless the transferred community service agency employee has previously served the minimum six-month probationary period.

All such transfers shall take place no later than June 30, 2006.

Transfers of employees from the community services agencies to the department of children's services or the department of health, pursuant to this section, shall not result in any diminution, impairment or interruption of current salary, accrued sick and annual leave, seniority, participation in the Tennessee consolidated retirement system, or amounts already accrued under a deferred compensation plan; however, this shall not impair the department's authority, through establishing policies and procedures, to correct salary disparities through the promotional process.

Any employee so transferred shall be eligible for promotion pursuant to the provisions of title 8, chapter 30, after the transfer takes effect.

This section shall not apply to a county having a metropolitan form of government whose employees provide services for the community service agencies pursuant to § 37-5-304 .

Acts 2001, ch. 390, § 1; 2005, ch. 354, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 1011, § 2, deleted former §37-5-304(e). The former reference to subsection (e) of the section has been deleted from the section reference in (f).

Former title 8, ch. 30, part 2, §§8-30-201 —8-30-224, concerning career service employees, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2012, ch. 800, §§ 10-21, effective October 1, 2012. Pursuant to §8-30-201, state service is now divided into the preferred service and executive service.

37-5-318. Transfer of employees from community services agencies to the department of children's services in counties with a metropolitan form of government.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, including § 8-30-309, any county having a metropolitan form of government whose employees provide services for the community services agency, pursuant to § 37-5-304, and who serve in positions funded by the department of children's services may be transferred to the department of children's services by the commissioner, on or before June 30, 2006. Such employees shall receive the benefits and protection of career service status and shall be eligible for participation in the state health insurance plan without further examination or competition. Salaries of transferred employees of a county having a metropolitan form of government shall be within the appropriate salary range for state job classifications and shall be at least equal to, but not less than, the median salary of department of children's services employees in the county having a metropolitan form of government.

All employees of a county having a metropolitan form of government who provide services for the community services agency, pursuant to § 37-5-304, and who are transferred to the department of children's services, pursuant to this section, shall be subject to a minimum probationary period of six (6) months beginning on the first day of service with the department, pursuant to §§ 8-30-312 and 8-30-314, unless the transferred employee has previously served the minimum six-month probationary period.

All such transfers shall take place no later than June 30, 2006.

Acts 2005, ch. 354, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 1011, § 2, deleted former §37-5-304(e). The former reference to subsection (e) of the section has been deleted from the section reference in (b).

37-5-319. Transfer of executive service employees whose functions are transferred from community services agencies to the department of children's services.

Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, including § 8-30-309, and recognizing the years of faithful and dedicated service to the state of Tennessee by the employees of the community services agencies, community services agency employees who serve in jobs that would be classified as executive service, as formerly defined in § 8-30-208 [repealed and reenacted], had they been employed in the state service, and whose functions and positions are transferred to the department of children's services by the commissioner on or before June 30, 2006, shall be transferred into the department of children's services. Such employees shall be eligible for participation in the state health insurance plan without further examination or competition.

All such transfers shall take place no later than June 30, 2006.

Transfers of employees from the community services agencies to the department of children's services pursuant to this section shall not result in any diminution, impairment or interruption of accrued sick and annual leave, seniority, participation in the Tennessee consolidated retirement system, or amounts already accrued under a deferred compensation plan.

Acts 2005, ch. 354, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 8, ch. 30, part 2, §§8-30-201 —8-30-224, concerning career service employees, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2012, ch. 800, §§ 10-21, effective October 1, 2012. Pursuant to §8-30-201, state service is now divided into the preferred service and executive service.